Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2675.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(a.7)(2)(i)(B) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.674, No.56), is amended to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--(a) The classes of income referred to above are as follows:* * *(a.7) The following apply:* * *(2) (i) The following shall not be subject to tax under 12345678910111213141516171819202122 this article:* * *(B) Any distribution that is excludable from tax under section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended[.], including a rollover from a qualified tuition program to a Roth IRA that is exempt from taxation under section 529(c)(3)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2675PN3717 - 2 - 123456789